Hawaii statutes.
§291-52.7
Fraudulent manufacture or alteration of placards and identification
cards. Any person who fraudulently manufactures or alters a removable
windshield placard, temporary removable windshield placard, or identification
card for personal use, sale, or issuance to another person to circumvent the
issuance requirements of this part, or any person who uses a fraudulently
manufactured or altered placard or identification card to circumvent the
issuance requirements of this part, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The
fraudulent manufacture or alteration of each placard and of each identification
card for personal use, sale, or issuance or is otherwise used in violation of
this section shall constitute a separate offense. [L 2001, c 297, pt of §1; am
L 2003, c 30, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next